Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.060

Penalties.

(1)(a) Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

(b) The director shall assess a civil penalty ranging from one hundred dollars to ten thousand dollars per occurrence, giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, and the history of previous violations. Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund.

(2) The penalties in subsection (1)(a) of this section do not apply to violations of RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120.

[ 2011 c 96 s 20; 2006 c 338 s 6; 1990 c 102 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.